Utah statutes.
58-61-301.   Licensure required.

(1) (a)  A license is required to engage in the practice of psychology, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 58-1-307(1)(c) an individual shall be certified under this chapter as a psychology resident in order to engage in a residency program of supervised clinical training necessary to meet licensing requirements as a psychologist under this chapter.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  psychologist; or

(b)  certified psychology resident.



Amended by Chapter 281, 2001 General Session

